Louisiana, session 2026, HB376.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2496(1)(a)(iii) and 2556(1)(a)(iii) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§2496. Temporary appointments
Temporary appointments may be made to positions in the classified service
without the appointees acquiring any permanent status therein as follows:
(1)(a)
* * *
(iii) When a vacancy is to be filled in the classes of entrance firefighter,
entrance police officer, entrance jailer, secretary to the chief, departmental records
clerk, and for the entrance classes for which the operation and maintenance of radio,
alarm, or signal systems for the respective fire or police service is the primary duty,
the appointing authority may make a provisional appointment of any person
considered qualified. A provisional appointment shall not exceed sixty ninety days.
Successive appointments in the classes of entrance firefighter, entrance police
officer, entrance jailer, secretary to the chief, departmental records clerk, and for the
entrance classes for which the operation and maintenance of radio, alarm, or signal
systems for the respective fire or police service is the primary duty shall be
prohibited.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 376 ENROLLED
§2556. Temporary appointments
Temporary appointments may be made to positions in the classified service
without the appointees acquiring any permanent status therein as follows:
(1)(a)
* * *
(iii) When a vacancy is to be filled in the classes of entrance firefighter,
entrance police officer, entrance jailer, secretary to the chief, departmental records
clerk, and for the entrance classes for which the operation and maintenance of radio,
alarm, or signal systems for the respective fire or police service is the primary duty,
the appointing authority may make a provisional appointment of any person
considered qualified. A provisional appointment shall not exceed sixty ninety days.
Successive appointments in the classes of entrance firefighter, entrance police
officer, entrance jailer, secretary to the chief, departmental records clerk, and for the
entrance classes for which the operation and maintenance of radio, alarm, or signal
systems for the respective fire or police service is the primary duty shall be
prohibited.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.